Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-616
Railroad property; levy of taxes; injunction prohibited.

No injunction shall be granted restraining the levy of taxes under the assessment made by the Property Tax Administrator.

Laws 1927, c. 174, § 1, p. 511;

C.S.1929, § 77-509;

R.S.1943, § 77-616;

Laws 1985, LB 268, § 15;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 72.